Colorado, session 2026A, HB1215.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 6-1-1402, amend
(5)(b) introductory portion as follows:
6-1-1402. Disclosure of information by online marketplaces to
inform consumers - reporting of suspicious marketplace activity.
(5) Reporting mechanism.
(b) An online marketplace shall alert a law enforcement agency if
the online marketplace knows or should have known that a third-party seller
is selling or attempting to sell stolen goods to a consumer in Colorado,
unless the online marketplace has received a notice from the law
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

enforcement agency that the same third-party seller is suspected OF SELLING
or attempting to sell the same stolen goods on the online marketplace to a
consumer in Colorado. An online marketplace shall establish:
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1215

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1215